 



XLMedia PLC: Acquisition of a Performance Media Company | Business Wire
























































XLMedia PLC: Acquisition of a Performance Media Company






June 16, 2015 02:01 AM Eastern Daylight Time



LONDON--(BUSINESS WIRE)--XLMedia (AIM: XLM), a leading provider of digital performance marketing 
      services, is pleased to announce that it has entered into an agreement 
      to acquire a majority stake of 54% in Marmar Media Ltd (“Marmar”), a 
      performance media company for web and mobile for a consideration of up 
      to $7.36 million in cash. The acquisition is expected to be immediately 
      earnings enhancing and is highly complementary to the Group’s 
      established media division.
    


      Marmar (www.marmarmedia.com) 
      specialises in performance based marketing for a number of verticals 
      including apps, software entertainment and to a lesser degree gambling. 
      Marmar generated revenues and EBITDA of $11 million and $2.2 million 
      (non GAAP) in FY 2014 respectively. Over 30% of Marmar’s revenues are 
      derived from mobile devices and Marmar expects this rate to grow to over 
      50% in the current year. Marmar was founded 2011, is based in Tel Aviv 
      and has 16 staff.
    

Strategic rationale for the acquisition


      XLMedia’s stated strategy is to expand its business both organically and 
      through acquisitions, while diversifying into new products and markets, 
      and act as a consolidator in a fragmented market.
    

      The acquisition of Marmar is highly complementary to the Group’s 
      existing business, and delivers the following key benefits:
    


Broaden the Group’s Mobile capabilities – Additional mobile 
        know-how and capabilities, which will further strengthen XLMedia’s 
        growth in the mobile channel
      

Market and product diversification – Marmar’s main activities 
        are in marketing apps, e-commerce and software products. Marmar’s main 
        markets are the US and Europe, adding further product and geographic 
        expansion of the group’s historical core markets
      

Benefits of scale – Marmar’s business is similar in many 
        aspects to the Group’s media divisions and therefore once integrated 
        management will be able to use the Group’s facilities and 
        infrastructure in order to enhance performance and support further 
        growth. Integrating Marmar into the Group should also provide benefits 
        of scale as a result of adding more campaigns and revenues using the 
        existing operational structure.
      


Key terms


      The Group will buy 54% of Marmar’s share capital from its current sole 
      shareholder, Mr. Oren Avidor, for a total consideration of up to $7.36 
      million in cash, comprised of an initial payment of $5.36 million and 
      additional contingent consideration of up to $2 million based on 
      Marmar’s EBITDA performance during the year ending March 31, 2016. 
      Marmar’s key management will remain in their position following closing. 
      Acquisition is expected to complete on 1 July 2015.
    

Ory Weihs, Chief Executive Officer of XLMedia, commented:


      “We are delighted to announce the acquisition of a majority stake in 
      Marmar Media, which is a highly complementary fit to the Group’s 
      existing business. One of the reasons for becoming a public company was 
      to enable the Group to grow through acquisitions and act as a 
      consolidator in what we believe is a highly fragmented market. We 
      believe this transaction is another good example of such an opportunity 
      to add another performance media company to the Group, delivering value 
      to our shareholders and scale to our business.
    

      “We have been investing significantly in both our infrastructure and 
      technology over the last 12 months, and believe we are now beginning to 
      see the real benefits of this investment delivering both scale and 
      profit growth for the Group.
    

      “Marmar complements the group’s offering, bringing additional know how 
      and mobile understandings in additional markets and products. The board 
      is happy to further diversify the group’s revenues and customer base. We 
      look forward to working with the Marmar management team to integrate the 
      business and grow the media division together.“
    


Contacts

XLMedia plcOry Weihs, 020 8817 5283www.xlmedia.comorVigo 
      CommunicationsJeremy Garcia / Fiona Henson, 020 7016 9570www.vigocomms.comorCenkos 
      Securities plc (Nomad and Joint Broker)Ivonne Cantu / Callum 
      Davidson, 020 7397 8900www.cenkos.comorLiberum 
      (Joint Broker)Neil Patel, 020 3100 2000www.liberum.com














Release Summary
XLMedia announces it is to acquire a majority stake of 54% in Marmar Media Ltd, a performance media company for web and mobile.






Contacts

XLMedia plcOry Weihs, 020 8817 5283www.xlmedia.comorVigo 
      CommunicationsJeremy Garcia / Fiona Henson, 020 7016 9570www.vigocomms.comorCenkos 
      Securities plc (Nomad and Joint Broker)Ivonne Cantu / Callum 
      Davidson, 020 7397 8900www.cenkos.comorLiberum 
      (Joint Broker)Neil Patel, 020 3100 2000www.liberum.com







 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up

















Crossrider.com - Home

























WE ARE PROUD TO HAVE CYBERGHOST JOIN THE CROSSRIDER TEAM
Offering its leading Virtual Private Network (VPN) solution to millions of customers worldwide
 
FIND OUT MORE











ONLINE DISTRIBUTION & DIGITAL PRODUCT HUB

WELCOME TO CROSSRIDER













WHO WE ARE. WHAT WE DO.
Crossrider is an online distributionand digital product company
Our company utilises its proprietary marketing technology platforms to prospect, optimise and monetise mobile and web media. Crossrider powers all aspects of an online product to create a superb user experience. The Company offers improved retention and re-engagement rates, greatly enhancing the value of user activity. Crossrider provides its platforms to its customers for use with their products as well as developing and expanding its own product portfolio.Our vision is to provide and develop best-in-class digital products for our users globally.





BUSINESS PARTNERS



































CHECK OUT OUR
PRODUCTS & SERVICES





 DIGITAL PRODUCTS
Development of desktop and mobile apps is our specialty, but development is only half of the journey, distribution is the second part of creating a successful product.
FIND OUT MORE




 AD SERVER/EXCHANGE
Ajillion is the first white-label mobile ad server and exchange. Its management platform provides a comprehensive SaaS solution for mobile AD AGENCYs, agencies & monetization platforms.
FIND OUT MORE




 AD AGENCY
Our multi-disciplinary team of campaign managers, analysts and media buyers joined forces with Crossrider developers to leverage DefinitiMedia and Cross-Mob.
FIND OUT MORE













NEWS TRAVEL FAST
IN THE PRESS















CyberGhost
We proudly announce the acquisition of Cyberghost - offering its virtual private network (VPN) solution to millions of customers worldwide
READ THE STORY 










Deloitte
Deloitte recognises Crossrider as the 4th fastest growing technology company in Israel. We are proud to be among the Titans
READ THE STORY 










TechTrends
The government wants to bolster cybersecurity. Is bitcoin regulation one answer?
READ THE STORY 
















DO YOU HAVE ANY QUESTIONS?
CONTACT US FOR MORE INFO
CONTACT US












CROSSRIDER TRAVELS THE GLOBE
MEET UPS & MEET US
We attend major conferences around the world and host tech-related meetups on our awesome rooftop - drop by if you're around!












13 Sept.14 Sept.
Digital marketing exposition & conference
13 - 14 September, 2017Adress: Koelnmesse GmbH, Messeplatz 150679 Cologne, Germany
LET'S MEET UP!









13 Sept.14 Sept.
Digital marketing exposition & conference
13 - 14 September, 2017Adress: Koelnmesse GmbH, Messeplatz 150679 Cologne, Germany
LET'S MEET UP!














JOIN OUR TEAM
CAREERS @ CROSSRIDER
Innovation is in our DNA. If you feel, think and act the same way - have a look at our open positions. We're always looking for new talents to join us
DISCOVER YOUR NEXT JOB







OCEAN VIEW






SWEET TOOTH






WORK MODE






SUMMERTIME






SUNSET VIEW






WORK MODE






OFFICE MASCOT






LIVE MUSIC






GUYS & CAKES






WORK MODE






SUNDECK






VIBES
















SOUNDS INTERESTING?
CONTACT US
Feel free to contact us if having any questions.Just fill out your details below and we'll get right back to you.  












CHOOSE SUBJECT
Ad Server / Exchange
Ad Agency
Digital Products
Other

































UNITED KINGDOM
Interchange TriangleStables Market, Chalk Farm Rd London, UK
VIEW ON MAP

ISRAEL
103 Allenby St.6513443Tel Aviv, Israel
VIEW ON MAP

CYPRUS
148 Strovolos avenueStrovolos 2028, 1st floorNicosia, Cyprus
VIEW ON MAP

ROMANIA
70-72 Dionisie Lupu St.District 1, 010457Bucharest, Romania
VIEW ON MAP

ISLE OF MAN
Sovereign House14-16 Nelson StreetDouglas, Isle of Man
VIEW ON MAP

PHILIPPINES
10th Floor Philam Life Tower8767 Paseo de RoxasMakati City, Philippines
VIEW ON MAP



















 



XLMedia plc (“XLMedia” or “the Group”) Acquisition of a Social Gaming Marketing Company | Business Wire


























































XLMedia plc (“XLMedia” or “the Group”) Acquisition of a Social Gaming 
      Marketing Company




Earnings enhancing acquisition into the high growth mobile and social 
      gaming market place






September 01, 2014 02:05 AM Eastern Daylight Time



LONDON--(BUSINESS WIRE)--XLMedia (AIM: XLM), a leading provider of digital performance marketing 
      services, is pleased to announce the acquisition of ExciteAd Digital 
      Marketing Ltd ("EDM"), a leading social and mobile gaming marketing 
      company, for a consideration of up to US$19 million in cash and shares. 
      The acquisition is expected to be immediately earnings enhancing and is 
      highly complementary to XLMedia’s Media division.
    

      EDM, which trades under the name "DAU-UP" (www.dauup.com), 
      specialises in social and mobile advertising specifically targeted at 
      ‘user acquisition’ for social gaming applications. EDM's principal 
      geographical market is the US, in addition to other English and German 
      speaking markets. EDM provides marketing services primarily to game 
      developers in social and mobile platforms for either a performance based 
      fee, such as CPI or cost per installation, or a management fee based on 
      marketing spend.
    

      EDM has an excellent track record of growth, reflecting the online 
      expansion of the social and mobile gaming market. For the 12 months 
      ended 30 June 2014, EDM delivered revenues of $12.8m and profit before 
      tax, excluding share based payments, of $3.0m (Management accounts, Non 
      GAAP). EDM was established in 2010, is based in Israel and employs 27 
      staff.
    

      Social Gaming, which involves playing online games (such as Casino 
      themed, strategy and adventure based) on social media or community 
      sites, is experiencing significant increased demand across web, 
      smartphones, and tablets platforms. According to market specialists 
      Technavio, the demand for these games is expected to continue to see 
      continued growth with an estimated CAGR of 24% in the US alone between 
      2012 and 2016. This strong growth is driven by the tremendous demand in 
      the mobile and smartphone markets and the free availability of many of 
      these games.
    

Strategic Rationale


      The acquisition is in line with the Group’s strategy, as set out during 
      its IPO in March 2014, to expand and diversify its activities into 
      complementary areas and act as a consolidator in a fragmented market.
    

      EDM is a highly complementary fit with XLMedia’s existing business, 
      delivering a range of synergies and strategic benefits. The acquisition 
      will diversify the business into new products and markets, targeting a 
      new customer base, as well as providing enhanced growth opportunities 
      within existing markets. In particular, benefits for the Group include:
    


        Strong growth in a fast paced and expanding market – social and mobile 
        games and applications are a fast expanding market which is not 
        subject to the same regulatory regime as the online gambling market. 
        EDM will provide the Group additional growth opportunities in this new 
        area.
      

        Social expertise – EDM's expertise in social and mobile marketing 
        supplements XLMedia's knowledge and understanding in marketing online 
        gambling.
      

        Mobile expertise – approximately 50% of EDM’s revenues are generated 
        through mobile users. Mobile users have also become a significant part 
        of the online gambling industry, with an anticipated 44% share of the 
        global interactive gambling market by 2018, according to market 
        research provider H2 Gambling Capital (H2).
      

        Revenue streams from regulated products and markets – social gaming, 
        which does not involve real money gambling, does not require a 
        licence. Expanding XLMedia's product range into this sector will 
        therefore strengthen the Group's position in regulated online gambling 
        markets such as the US and UK.
      

        A new customer base – EDM’s customers typically comprise game 
        developers in social platforms, presenting a new target audience for 
        XLMedia.
      

        An expanded geographic reach – EDM's principal market is the US, with 
        additional revenues derived from other English and German speaking 
        markets as well as other countries outside of XLMedia’s core 
        Scandinavian markets, representing diversification for the Group into 
        new geographies.
      

        Strong analytic systems – EDM uses its proprietary internal systems 
        for both analysis of performance as well as for campaign definitions 
        and building. Integrating these tools into XLMedia's own network will 
        contribute to the Group's performance and improvement.
      


Consideration and key terms


      Under the terms of the share purchase agreement, the Group will acquire 
      (on a debt free cash free basis) the entire issued share capital of EDM 
      from its current shareholders which include Mr.Idan Nizri, the principal 
      shareholder, founder and CEO, as well as other investors (the “Sellers”) 
      for a total consideration of up to US$19 million (approximately £11.4 
      million). XLMedia will pay US$12 million in cash immediately and two 
      additional payments of up to an aggregate US$7 million will be payable 
      based on EDM’s EBITDA performance during the first and second years 
      after 1 July 2014, 71% of which may (at XLMedia’s discretion) be 
      satisfied by the issue of new ordinary shares in XLMedia(“XLMedia 
      Shares”). The value of any new XLMedia Shares issued will be based on an 
      agreed trailing average of the closing days trading price prior to 
      election to issue the relevant shares. Each portion of any share 
      consideration will be subject to an appropriate slow release 
      arrangement. Mr. Nizri will remain with EDM for a minimum period of two 
      years and shall be entitled to a seat on EDM's board of directors.
    

Commenting on the acquisition, Mr. Ory Weihs, CEO of XLMedia said,


“We are delighted to be announcing the acquisition of EDM, our 
      largest transaction since listing in London. One of the main 
      reasons behind our IPO was to enable the Group to act as a consolidator 
      in highly fragmented markets. Since listing, we have been working hard 
      to execute such deals and are therefore excited to conclude the 
      acquisition of EDM, a global leader in the social and gaming marketing 
      arena."


“EDM represents a highly complementary fit for our business, is 
      immediately earnings enhancing, strengthens our reach in the US, 
      delivers diversification into social gaming and extends our current 
      gambling expertise and customer base. We look forward to working with 
      the EDM team and to continue to execute our stated growth strategy.”





Contacts

XLMedia plcOry Weihs, 020 8817 5283www.xlmedia.comorBuchananJeremy 
      Garcia / Sophie McNulty/ Clare Akhurst020 7466 5000www.buchanan.uk.comorCenkos 
      Securities plcIvonne Cantu/ Callum Davidson020 7397 8900
    














Contacts

XLMedia plcOry Weihs, 020 8817 5283www.xlmedia.comorBuchananJeremy 
      Garcia / Sophie McNulty/ Clare Akhurst020 7466 5000www.buchanan.uk.comorCenkos 
      Securities plcIvonne Cantu/ Callum Davidson020 7397 8900
    








 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up














		Form 8.3 - XLMedia Plc - RNS - London Stock Exchange

 






 




 



Regulatory Story


Go to market news section

  
			
			










Hargreave Hale Limited  -  XLM   
Form 8.3 - XLMedia Plc
Released 12:12 18-Mar-2016













Form 8.3 - XLMedia Plc

    LONDON--(BUSINESS WIRE)--



FORM 8.3


PUBLIC OPENING POSITION DISCLOSURE/DEALING DISCLOSURE BY


A PERSON WITH INTERESTS IN RELEVANT SECURITIES REPRESENTING 1% OR MORE


Rule 8.3 of the Takeover Code (the “Code”)


1. KEY INFORMATION




(a) Full name of discloser:


           
        

          HARGREAVE HALE LIMITED (for Discretionary Clients)
        





(b) Owner or controller of interests and short positions
          disclosed, if different from 1(a):

The naming of nominee or vehicle companies is insufficient. For
            a trust, the trustee(s), settlor and beneficiaries must be named.





          N/A
        





(c) Name of offeror/offeree in relation to whose relevant
          securities this form relates:

Use a separate form for each offeror/offeree





          XLMEDIA PLC
        





(d) If an exempt fund manager connected with an offeror/offeree,
          state this and specify identity of offeror/offeree:




          N/A
        





(e) Date position held/dealing undertaken:

For an opening position disclosure, state the latest
            practicable date prior to the disclosure





          17 MARCH 2016
        





(f) In addition to the company in 1(c) above, is the discloser
          making disclosures in respect of any other party to the offer?

If it is a cash offer or possible cash offer, state “N/A”





          NO

          
If YES, specify which:







2. POSITIONS OF THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSURE


If there are positions or rights to subscribe to disclose in more
      than one class of relevant securities of the offeror or offeree named in
      1(c), copy table 2(a) or (b) (as appropriate) for each additional class
      of relevant security.


(a) Interests and short positions in the relevant securities
      of the offeror or offeree to which the disclosure relates following the
      dealing (if any)




Class of relevant security:


           
        

ORDINARY USD 0.000001







             
          




Interests


           
        

Short positions








Number


           
        

%




Number


           
        

%






(1) Relevant securities owned and/or controlled:




7,478,450




3.7326




           
        



           
        





(2) Cash-settled derivatives:




           
        



           
        



           
        



           
        





(3) Stock-settled derivatives (including options) and agreements
          to purchase/sell:




           
        



           
        



           
        



           
        






TOTAL:





7,478,450




3.7326




           
        



           
        





All interests and all short positions should be disclosed.


Details of any open stock-settled derivative positions (including
      traded options), or agreements to purchase or sell relevant securities,
      should be given on a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions).


(b) Rights to subscribe for new securities (including
      directors’ and other employee options)




Class of relevant security in relation to which subscription
          right exists:


           
        



Details, including nature of the rights concerned and relevant
          percentages:


           
        



3. DEALINGS (IF ANY) BY THE PERSON MAKING THE DISCLOSURE


Where there have been dealings in more than one class of relevant
      securities of the offeror or offeree named in 1(c), copy table 3(a),
      (b), (c) or (d) (as appropriate) for each additional class of relevant
      security dealt in.


The currency of all prices and other monetary amounts should be
      stated.


(a) Purchases and sales




Class of relevant security


           
        

Purchase/sale


           
        

Number of securities


           
        

Price per unit






ORDINARY




SALE




100,000




70.787p






(b) Cash-settled derivative transactions




Class of relevant security


           
        

Product description

e.g. CFD



           
        

Nature of dealing

e.g. opening/closing a long/short position, increasing/reducing
            a long/short position



           
        

Number of reference securities


           
        

Price per unit






          NONE
        




             
          




           
        



           
        



           
        





(c) Stock-settled derivative transactions (including options)


(i) Writing, selling, purchasing or varying




Class of relevant security


           
        

Product description e.g. call option


           
        

Writing, purchasing, selling, varying etc.


           
        

Number of securities to which option relates


           
        

Exercise price per unit


           
        

Type

e.g. American, European etc.



           
        

Expiry date


           
        

Option money paid/ received per unit






          NONE
        



           
        



           
        



           
        



           
        



           
        



           
        



           
        





(ii) Exercise




Class of relevant security


           
        

Product description

e.g. call option



           
        

Exercising/ exercised against


           
        

Number of securities


           
        

Exercise price per unit






(d) Other dealings (including subscribing for new securities)




Class of relevant security


           
        

Nature of dealing

e.g. subscription, conversion



           
        

Details


           
        

Price per unit (if applicable)






NONE




           
        



           
        



           
        





4. OTHER INFORMATION


(a) Indemnity and other dealing arrangements




Details of any indemnity or option arrangement, or any agreement
          or understanding, formal or informal, relating to relevant
          securities which may be an inducement to deal or refrain from
          dealing entered into by the person making the disclosure and any
          party to the offer or any person acting in concert with a party to
          the offer:

Irrevocable commitments and letters of intent should not be
            included. If there are no such agreements, arrangements or
            understandings, state “none”






            NONE
          




(b) Agreements, arrangements or understandings relating to
      options or derivatives




Details of any agreement, arrangement or understanding, formal or
          informal, between the person making the disclosure and any other
          person relating to:

(i) the voting rights of any relevant securities under any
            option; or 


(ii) the voting rights or future acquisition or disposal of any
            relevant securities to which any derivative is referenced:


If there are no such agreements, arrangements or
            understandings, state “none”






            NONE
          




(c) Attachments




Is a Supplemental Form 8 (Open Positions) attached?


          NO
        





Date of disclosure:


           
        

18 MARCH 2016






Contact name:




DAVID CLUEIT

HARGREAVE HALE LTD







Telephone number:




01253 754739






Public disclosures under Rule 8 of the Code must be made to a
      Regulatory Information Service and must also be emailed to the Takeover
      Panel at monitoring@disclosure.org.uk.
The Panel’s Market Surveillance Unit is available for consultation in
      relation to the Code’s disclosure requirements on +44 (0)20 7638 0129.


The Code can be viewed on the Panel’s website at www.thetakeoverpanel.org.uk.



View source version on businesswire.com: http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20160318005373/en/

      Hargreave Hale Limited
    
Source: Hargreave Hale Limited



Close


 

 















 






 



London Stock Exchange plc is not responsible for and does not check content on this Website. Website users are responsible for checking content. Any news item (including any prospectus) which is addressed solely to the persons and countries specified therein should not be relied upon other than by such persons and/or outside the specified countries. Terms and conditions, including restrictions on use and distribution apply.



©2014 London Stock Exchange plc. All rights reserved



 
Form 8.3 - XLMedia Plc - RNS











  




XLM.L | XLMedia PLC share price | Fundamentals and charts | IG AE
































































Personal


Logout


                        My IG
                    




عربي 


Personal
Institutional








IG






    Create account



    Login



Menu

Menu



                            Search
                        


عربي 





Help



Contact






United Arab Emirates
                            
                            




Search
Search












    Login



    Create account






                        Indices
                        





                                    Indices
                                



                                       Indices CFD costs and details
                                    



                                       MT4 Indices CFD details
                                    





                        Shares 
                        





                                    Shares 
                                



                                       Share CFD costs and details
                                    



                                       Shares DMA
                                    



                                       Extended hours on US stocks
                                    





                        Forex
                        





                                    Forex
                                



                                       Forex costs and details
                                    



                                       Forex Direct
                                    



                                       Forex MT4 details
                                    



                                       What is forex trading
                                    



                                       How does forex trading work
                                    



                                       How to trade forex with IG
                                    





                        Commodities
                        





                                    Commodities
                                



                                       Commodities CFD details
                                    



                                       MT4 Commodity CFD details
                                    





                        Other markets
                        





                                    Other markets
                                



                                       IG digital 100s CFDs
                                    



                                       Options CFDs
                                    



                                       Interest rates CFDs
                                    



                                       Sectors CFDs
                                    



                                       Bonds CFDs
                                    



                                       ETPs
                                    



                                       Sunday trading
                                    





                        IG services
                        





                                    IG services
                                



                                       CFD trading
                                    



                                       Corporate account
                                    



                                       Our charges
                                    



                                       What are the risks?
                                    



                                       Risk management
                                    



                                       Contract details
                                    



                                       Affiliates programme
                                    



                                       What's new at IG?
                                    





                        Trading platforms
                        





                                    Trading platforms
                                



                                       Web
                                    



                                       Trading apps
                                    



                                       MetaTrader 4
                                    



                                       Advanced platforms
                                    



                                       Platform features
                                    



                                       Compare features
                                    





                        IG analysis
                        





                                    IG analysis
                                



                                       Market data
                                    



                                       News and analysis
                                    



                                       The week ahead
                                    



                                       Economic Calendar
                                    



                                       Market Screener
                                    



                                       Trading diary
                                    



                                       Signal Centre
                                    



                                       IG Live
                                    



                                       Trade of the week
                                    



                                       French election 2017
                                    





                        Education
                        





                                    Education
                                



                                       Trading seminars
                                    



                                       Articles and guides
                                    



                                       Introduction programme
                                    



                                       IG Academy app
                                    



                                       Glossary of trading terms
                                    











                                          IG analysis
                            








                                    Market data
                                



                                    News and analysis
                                



                                    The week ahead
                                



                                    Economic Calendar
                                



                                    Market Screener
                                



                                    Trading diary
                                



                                    Signal Centre
                                



                                    Trade of the week
                                



                                    French election 2017
                                














            CFDs are a leveraged product and can result in losses that exceed deposits. Trading CFDs may not be suitable for everyone, so please ensure you fully understand the risks and take care to manage your exposure.
        




                
                Over 40-years' heritage
                
            


                
                Over 185,000 clients worldwide
                
            


                
                15,000 markets worldwide
                
            








XLMedia PLC

                Change: 0% (0.00 pts) during the current or most recent trading day
            













             Open an account now 

        



                Demo account
        



                            Create account
                    










CFD: 
-









                0%
            

                0.00pts
            


            High: 131.00
            Low: 131.00




Sell
135.00




Buy
135.00












Details for XLMedia PLC -



Dealing Minimum size 
    1 Share(s)

25%
 Minimum stop distance 
    1
 Min guaranteed stop distance 
    10.0%
 Slippage factor 
    60.0%



Market hours 11:00 - 19:30 (Gulf Time Zone)
    




Margin requirements
Your aggregate position in this market will be margined in the following tiers:




Tier
 Position size (Share(s)) 
Margin


1
0 - 11200
25%


2
11200 - 22400
40%


3
22400 - 33600
60%


4
33600 +
75%




If your aggregate position is larger than Tier 1, your margin requirement will not be reduced by non-guaranteed stops.
Please note: we have tried to ensure that the information here is as accurate as possible, but it is intended for guidance only and any errors will not be binding on us.




Special info
[Unborrowable]



Create account
Log in














XLMedia PLC

                Change: 0% (0.00 pts) during the current or most recent trading day
            










                                Already an IG client?
                                Login to trade






            
                
                
                    CFDs are a leveraged product and can result in losses that exceed deposits. Trading CFDs may not be suitable for everyone, so please ensure you fully understand the risks and take care to manage your exposure.
                
            
        







    

    Buy/Sell

    
        







             Open an account

        
Already an IG client? Log in to trade
It’s free to open an account, takes less than five minutes, and there’s no obligation to fund or trade.



                Demo account
        



                            Create Account
                    

















             Find a market to trade

        



Share Finder














             Why trade with IG?

        



Free live prices, data
Plus news and opinion from our expert analysts





Over 15,000 global markets
With trading opportunities 24 hours a day





Desktop, mobile, tablet
Seamless functionality with our multi-device platform







Spreads from 0.4 points
Plus tiered margining for even better value





MT4 platform
Superior execution with no third-party bridges





Advanced charting
100+ technical indicators and automated trading with ProRealTime













             Open an account now

        
It’s free to open an account, takes less than five minutes, and there’s no obligation to fund or trade.



                Create account
        



                            Demo account
                    













Client sentiment i

x
The percentage of IG client accounts with positions in this market that are currently long or short. Calculated to the nearest 1%.











100%
                of IG client accounts with open positions in this market expect the price to rise
            

0%
                of IG client accounts with open positions in this market expect the price to fall
            

51–250
                IG client accounts have open positions in this market
            









Other positions taken by clients trading this market i

x
Find out what other markets are being traded by IG client accounts that hold a position on the market herein, and see sentiment data from these accounts only. The circle for each market show the percentage of these accounts with positions that are currently long or short. This is calculated to the nearest 1% and is updated automatically every 15 minutes.To find out the client sentiment of a market amongst all IG client accounts (not just those with positions on the market herein) see the client sentiment section of the relevant market data page.










IQE PLC









Taptica International Limited









Boohoo.com plc









Somero Enterprises Inc



This is calculated to the nearest 1%.













             Sign up today

        
Open an IG account and start trading today, or test-drive our platform with a risk-free demo.



                Create account
        



                            Demo account
                    










             You might be interested in...

        




Our charges

Our charges are clear and transparent, so you’ll always know what fees to expect.






Charting packages

Use IG charts and advanced ProRealTime and Autochartist packages.






Execution and pricing

Get fast, reliable execution and the best available prices.










































Markets
Forex
Indices
Shares
Digital 100
Other Markets









IG services
CFD trading









Trading platforms
Web platform
Trading apps
Advanced platforms
Compare features









IG analysis
Market news



















Contact us
New client: 04 559 2108
Clients: 04 559 2100
Tweet us: @IGMENA









AE







IG | Sitemap | Terms and agreements | Privacy | Help and support | About IG








Follow us online:

Facebook
Twitter
YouTube












CFDs are a leveraged product and can result in losses that exceed deposits. Please ensure you fully understand the risks and take care to manage your exposure.
Trading CFDs may not be suitable for everyone, so please ensure that you fully understand the risks involved. IG does not issue advice, recommendations or opinion in relation to acquiring, holding or disposing of a CFD. IG is not a financial advisor and all services are provided on an execution only basis.
IG is a trading name of IG Limited a company registered at 2702 & 2703 Level 27, Tower 2, Al Fattan Currency House, DIFC, Dubai, United Arab Emirates. IG is authorised and regulated by the Dubai Financial Services Authority under Firm’s reference No. (F001780).
The information on this site is not directed at residents of the United States, Belgium or any particular country outside the UAE and is not intended for distribution to, or use by, any person in any country or jurisdiction where such distribution or use would be contrary to local law or regulation.
































2003-2017















IG Group | Careers











            CFDs are a leveraged product and can result in losses that exceed deposits. Trading CFDs may not be suitable for everyone, so please ensure you fully understand the risks and take care to manage your exposure.
        



























Acquisition of cyber security comparison website | XLMedia PLC (XLM) | RNS Company Announcements | Equities  | FE Trustnet

























 


















Trustnet








Login


















To continue using this website, please tell us a  little about yourself:
 I am a financial adviser
 I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
 I am a financial paraplanner
 I work in financial services
 I am a private investor


   This site uses cookies.  Some of the cookies are essential for parts of the site to operate and have already been set.  
   You may delete and block all cookies from this site, but if you do, parts of the site may not work.  To find out more 
   about cookies on the website and how to delete cookies, see our Privacy and Cookie Policy.
   
 I accept the FE Trustnet cookie policy


Continue

For more information Click here






Investments

Unit Trusts & OEICs

Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs

IA Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
IA UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Equities

Equities Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Equity Factsheets
Latest announcements


Investment Trusts

Investment Trusts Home
Prices & Performance
Investment Trust Ratings
A-Z Investment Trust Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Warrants
A-Z Sectors
Split Capital Analytics
Investment Trust Guide
Most viewed investment trusts
Most viewed groups


Pensions

Pensions Home
Prices & Performance
Pension Fund Ratings
A-Z Pension Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Pension Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Life

Life Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Life Fund Ratings
A-Z Life Fund Factsheets
A-Z Life Group Factsheets
A-Z Life Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Life insurance glossary
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Offshore Funds

Offshore Funds Home
Prices & Performance
Offshore Fund Ratings
A-Z Offshore Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Offshore Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


ETFs

ETFs Home
ETF Prices & Performance
ETF Fund Ratings
A-Z ETF Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
ETFs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


VCTs

VCTs Home
VCT Prices & Performance
A-Z VCT Factsheets
VCTs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Structured Products

Structured Products Home
A-Z Structured Product Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
Structured products guide
Structured products glossary




Fund Managers

Fund Managers Home
Alpha managers
League table 
A-Z manager factsheets 


News & Research

News & Research Home
News Archive
Education guides

Education guides home
Emerging Market

ETFs
Unit Trust & OEIC

Investment trust


                                Offshore funds 
ISAs 


FE Trustnet Videos 
Bright-talk Videos 


Learning

Learn about investing
Investment basics

Pensions
Investing in a fund
Investment trusts
Exchange
                                Traded Funds (ETFs)
Passive funds
                                and trackers
What is an ISA?


What to invest in?

Bonds
Equities
Property
Commodities


Where to invest?

UK
US
Europe
Emerging markets
Asia


How to invest?


                                Setting objectives for your portfolio
Asset allocation
                                - the basics
Measuring performance

                                Onshore and offshore - what’s the difference


Fund ratings

About FE Ratings
FE Crown Fund Ratings
FE Passive Fund Ratings
FE Alpha Manager
                                Ratings
FE Risk Scores
The Adviser Fund
                                Index




Portfolio

Portfolio Home
Watchlist
Alerts


Tools

Home
Fundswire

Fundswire Home
Manage my alerts


Charting
Find an IFA
Pension Calculator
IFA tools

IFA tools home
FE AFI
Client Fund Profiler
Structured Products
Whitelabel Factsheets




Passive FundsNew

Passive Funds Homepage
Sectors

UK Equities
North American Equities
European Equities
Japanese Equities
Emerging Market Equities
UK Gilts
Property
Sterling Corporate Bonds
Index-Linked Gilts









Reading List




Clear all list



0


Your Basket


Aberdeen Global Indian Equity D2 GBP 





Open basket


















Login







Select Account..




Login
 Remember Me

Password Reminder
Not Registered? Click Here







Register





*

*

*



*


*

Choose a User Type
I am a financial adviser
I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
I am a financial paraplanner
I work in financial services
I am a private investor

*
 I accept your terms of use
 Send me FE Trustnet bulletins
Register





It's look like you're leaving us

            What would you like us to do with the funds you've selected
        
Show me all my options
        Forget them
        Save them 

            Remember my choice











        Customise this table













Company
EPIC/TIDM
SEDOL/ISIN
































Share


Tweet






 
                    Print   
                     
                    RSS





XLMedia PLC (XLM)



XLMedia PLC

Acquisition of cyber security comparison website

RNS Number : 2193J XLMedia PLC 27 June 2017  





For immediate release


27 June 2017




 
 
XLMedia PLC
("XLMedia" or "the Group" or "the Company")
 
Acquisition of cyber security comparison website
 
XLMedia (AIM: XLM), a leading provider of performance marketing, is pleased to announce the acquisition of Securethoughts.com ("Securethoughts"), a leading US cyber security comparison website, for a total cash consideration of US$2.0 million.  The acquisition is expected to be immedietly earnings enhancing post its completion in the third quarter of 2017.
 
Cyber security is an area increasing in prominence and interest and  has been identified by management as  a growth vertical for the Group. Securethoughts represents XLMedia's first significant publishing asset in this sector and will strengthen the Group's activities in North America as well as further diversifying XLMedia's revenue into non-gaming sectors.
 
Growth in the global cyber security industry is being driven by indiviuals, businesses and governments seeking to counteract the increasing threat of cyber crime. Securethoughts provides visitors to the site with information, advice, guides and support to help protect their digital communications, actions and discussions. 
 
Cybersecurity Ventures* is predicting growth in the cyber security market of about 12-15% year-on-year through 2021.
 
Ory Weihs, Chief Executive Officer of XLMedia, commented:
 
"We are delighted to announce the acquisition of Securethoughts, our first and significant publishing asset in the fast growing cyber security sector. Securethoughts represents another excellent opportunity for XLMedia to increase its North American presence, diversify its revenues and establish a foothold in another vertical.
 
"This acquisition is a further step in executing our successful strategy of diversifying our activities and expanding into additional markets and geographies."
 
 
For further information, please contact:
 




XLMedia plc
Ory Weihs
www.xlmedia.com
 


Tel: 020 8817 5283




Vigo Communications
Jeremy Garcia / Fiona Henson / Natalie Jones
www.vigocomms.com
 


Tel: 020 7830 9703




Cenkos Securities plc (Nomad and Joint Broker)
Ivonne Cantu / Camilla Hume
www.cenkos.com
 


Tel: 020 7397 8900




Berenberg (Joint Broker)
Chris Bowman / Mark Whitmore / Amritha Murali
www.berenberg.com
 
 


Tel: 020 3207 7800




 
 
* http://cybersecurityventures.com/cybersecurity-market-report/

This information is provided by RNSThe company news service from the London Stock Exchange   END  ACQEANKKALSXEFF











quick links
Equity Home
Equity Prices and Performance
Latest announcements


our product portfolio
www.trustnet.com
www.trustnetoffshore.com
www.trustnetmiddleeast.com


 
www.investegate.co.uk
www.fundlistings.com
FE Analytics


 
Data feeds
Factsheet and literature Production
Webtools










Data provided by FE. Care has been taken to ensure that the information is correct, but FE neither warrants, represents nor guarantees the contents of information, nor does it accept any responsibility for errors, inaccuracies, omissions or any inconsistencies herein. Past performance does not predict future performance, it should not be the main or sole reason for making an investment decision. The value of investments and any income from them can fall as well as rise.



Login
Help
Contact Us









For Equity investors
FE Investegate
For Private investors
Trustnet Direct
For Professional investors
FE Invest
FE Analytics
FE Data feeds
FE Fund listings
For International investors
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Middle East


Quick links
Trustnet-Magazine
Investment research
FE Trustnet videos
Top rated funds
Top performing funds
Find a fund
Build a portfolio
The UK’s best fund managers
Performance charting
About us


Fund performance
IA unit trusts & OEICs
Equities
Investment trusts
Pension funds
Life funds
Offshore funds
ETFs
Venture capital trusts


Stay connected with FE Trustnet






Trustnet mobile website















LATEST :
Five reasons to keep hold of your defensive funds
13:00 | Monday, January 20, 2014






You are currently using an old browser which will not be supported by Trustnet after 31/07/2016.  To ensure you benefit from all features on the site, please update your browser.   Close 






















                © Trustnet Limited 2017. All Rights Reserved.
                Please read our Terms of Use / Disclaimer and Privacy and
                    Cookie Policy.
                Data supplied in conjunction with Thomson Financial Limited, London Stock Exchange
                Plc, StructuredRetailProducts.com and ManorPark.com









 




XLM.L | XLMedia PLC share price | Fundamentals and charts | IG AU
































































Personal


Logout


                        My IG
                    






                    English
            

                    简体中文
            

                    繁體中文
            



Personal
Institutional








IG






    Create account



    Login



Menu

Menu



                            Search
                        




                    English
            

                    简体中文
            

                    繁體中文
            






Help



Contact






Australia
                            
                            




Search
Search












    Login



    Create account






                        Share trading
                        





                                    Share trading
                                



                                       Charges and fees
                                    



                                       Our collateral service
                                    



                                       Transfer shares to IG
                                    



                                       Important documents
                                    



                                       How to buy shares
                                    





                        CFD trading
                        





                                    CFD trading
                                



                                       Charges and margins
                                    



                                       Is CFD trading for me?
                                    



                                       What are the risks?
                                    



                                       CFD account details
                                    



                                       What is CFD trading
                                    



                                       How does CFD trading work
                                    



                                       How to trade CFDs with IG
                                    



                                       What can you trade with a CFD
                                    





                        Indices
                        





                                    Indices
                                



                                       Indices trading costs and contract details
                                    





                        Forex
                        





                                    Forex
                                



                                       Costs and details
                                    



                                       Forex Direct
                                    



                                       Forex volume rebate
                                    



                                       What is forex trading
                                    



                                       How does forex trading work
                                    



                                       How to trade forex with IG
                                    





                        Other markets
                        





                                    Other markets
                                



                                       Shares
                                    



                                       IG digital 100s
                                    



                                       Commodities
                                    



                                       Cryptocurrency trading
                                    



                                       Options
                                    



                                       AUD-denominated CFDs
                                    



                                       Interest rates
                                    



                                       Sectors
                                    



                                       Bonds
                                    



                                       ETPs
                                    



                                       IPOs
                                    



                                       Sunday trading
                                    



                                       ETFs
                                    





                        Trading platforms
                        





                                    Trading platforms
                                



                                       Web
                                    



                                       Trading apps
                                    



                                       MetaTrader 4
                                    



                                       Advanced platforms
                                    



                                       Platform features
                                    



                                       Compare features
                                    





                        Analysis
                        





                                    Analysis
                                



                                       News and analysis 
                                    



                                       Economic calendar
                                    



                                       Weekly market report
                                    



                                       IG TV
                                    



                                       Market data
                                    



                                       Signal Centre
                                    



                                       Financial outlook 2017
                                    



                                       UK general election 2017
                                    





                        Education
                        





                                    Education
                                



                                       Learn to trade
                                    



                                       Trading webinars 
                                    



                                       CFD introduction programme
                                    



                                       IG Academy app
                                    



                                       Glossary of trading terms
                                    





                        About IG
                        





                                    About IG
                                



                                       Corporate accounts
                                    



                                       Premium services
                                    



                                       Why IG?
                                    



                                       Protecting your money
                                    



                                       Affiliates
                                    



                                       IG Community
                                    











                                          Analysis
                            








                                    News and analysis 
                                



                                    Economic calendar
                                



                                    Weekly market report
                                



                                    IG TV
                                



                                    Market data
                                



                                    Signal Centre
                                



                                    Financial outlook 2017
                                



                                    UK general election 2017
                                

















                
                Over 40 years’ heritage
                
            


                
                Over 185,000 clients worldwide
                
            


                
                Over 15,000 markets
                
            








XLMedia PLC

                Change: 0% (0.00 pts) during the current or most recent trading day
            













             Open an account now

        



                Demo account
        



                            Create account
                    










CFD: 
-









                0%
            

                0.00pts
            


            High: 131.00
            Low: 131.00




Sell
135.00




Buy
135.00












Details for XLMedia PLC -



Dealing Minimum size 
    1 Share(s)

25%
 Minimum stop distance 
    1
 Min guaranteed stop distance 
    10.0%
 Slippage factor 
    60.0%



Market hours 17:00 - 01:30 (Australian - Melbourne Local Time)
    




Margin requirements
Your aggregate position in this market will be margined in the following tiers:




Tier
 Position size (Share(s)) 
Margin


1
0 - 11200
25%


2
11200 - 22400
40%


3
22400 - 33600
60%


4
33600 +
75%




If your aggregate position is larger than Tier 1, your margin requirement will not be reduced by non-guaranteed stops.
Please note: we have tried to ensure that the information here is as accurate as possible, but it is intended for guidance only and any errors will not be binding on us.




Special info
[Unborrowable]



Create account
Log in














XLMedia PLC

                Change: 0% (0.00 pts) during the current or most recent trading day
            










                                Already an IG client?
                                Log in to trade










    

    Buy/Sell

    
        







             Open an account

        
Already an IG client? Log in to trade
It’s free to open an account, takes less than five minutes, and there’s no obligation to fund or trade.



                Demo account
        



                            Create Account
                    

















             Find a market to trade

        



Share Finder














             Why trade with IG?

        



Live prices, data
Plus news and opinion from our expert analysts





Over 15,000 global markets
With trading opportunities 24 hours a day





Desktop, mobile, tablet
Seamless functionality with our multi-device platform







Spreads from 0.4 points
Plus tiered margining for even better value





MT4 platform
Outstanding execution with no third-party bridges





Advanced charting
100+ technical indicators and automated trading with ProRealTime













             Open an account now

        
There's no minimum balance to open an account, it takes less than five minutes, and there's no obligation to fund or trade.



                Demo account
        



                            Create account
                    













Client sentiment i

x
The percentage of IG client accounts with positions in this market that are currently long or short. Calculated to the nearest 1%.











100%
                of IG client accounts with open positions in this market expect the price to rise
            

0%
                of IG client accounts with open positions in this market expect the price to fall
            

51–250
                IG client accounts have open positions in this market
            









Other positions taken by clients trading this market i

x
Find out what other markets are being traded by IG client accounts that hold a position on the market herein, and see sentiment data from these accounts only. The circle for each market show the percentage of these accounts with positions that are currently long or short. This is calculated to the nearest 1% and is updated automatically every 15 minutes.To find out the client sentiment of a market amongst all IG client accounts (not just those with positions on the market herein) see the client sentiment section of the relevant market data page.










IQE PLC









Taptica International Limited









Boohoo.com plc









Somero Enterprises Inc



This is calculated to the nearest 1%.













             Sign up today

        
Open an IG account and start trading today, or test-drive our platform with a risk-free demo.



                Demo account
        



                            Create account
                    










             You might be interested in...

        




Our charges

Our charges are clear and transparent, so you’ll always know what fees to expect.






Charting packages

Use IG charts and advanced ProRealTime and Autochartist packages.






Execution and pricing

Get fast, reliable execution and the best available prices.










































Markets
Share Trading
Share CFDs
Forex
Indices
Commodities
Other markets









Trading platforms
Web platform
Trading apps
Advanced platforms
Demo account









Analysis
News and analysis
Economic calendar
IG TV










About
Corporate accounts
Premium services
Affiliates
Charges and margins
IG Community
Refer a friend



















Contact us
T: +61 (3) 9860 1734
E: helpdesk.au@ig.com
@IGClientHelp
Follow us online.









AU







IG | Sitemap | Terms and agreements | Privacy | Help and support | How to fund | Cookies | About IG








Follow us online:

Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
YouTube
Google Plus












CFDs are a leveraged product and can result in losses that exceed deposits.  You do not own or have any interest in the underlying asset. Please consider the Margin Trading Product Disclosure Statement (PDS) before entering into any CFD transaction with us.
The value of shares and ETFs bought through an IG share trading account can fall as well as rise, which could mean getting back less than you originally put in.
Please ensure you fully understand the risks and take care to manage your exposure. 
IG does not issues advice, recommendations or opinion in relation to acquiring, holding or disposing of our products. IG is not a financial advisor and all services are provided on an execution only basis.
This website is owned and operated by IG Markets Limited. ABN 84 099 019 851, AFSL 220440. Derivatives issuer licence in New Zealand, FSP No. 18923
The information on this site is not directed at residents of the United States or any particular country outside Australia or New Zealand and is not intended for distribution to, or use by, any person in any country or jurisdiction where such distribution or use would be contrary to local law or regulation.





















2003-2017















 IG Group | Careers













                    Your capital is at risk. CFDs can result in losses that exceed your initial deposit. Please ensure you fully understand the risks involved.
                






















FE Investegate |XLMedia PLC Announcements | XLMedia PLC: Final Results























We use cookies on our website. If you continue to browse our website without taking any action, we will assume that you are happy to receive all cookies from our website.
Read More Dismiss


Financial Express (Holdings) Limited (“we”, “our”, “us” and derivatives) are committed to protecting and respecting your privacy. This Privacy Policy, together with our Terms of Use, sets out the basis on which any personal data that we collect from you, or that you provide to us, will be processed by us relating to your use of any of the below websites (“sites”).

FEAnalytics.com
FEInvest.net
FETransmission.com
Investegate.co.uk
Trustnet.hk
Trustnetoffshore.com
Trustnetmiddleeast.com

For the purposes of the Data Protection Act 1998, the data controller is Trustnet Limited of 2nd Floor, Golden House, 30 Great Pulteney Street, London, W1F 9NN. Our nominated representative for the purpose of this Act is Kirsty Witter.
WHAT INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT ABOUT YOU?
We collect information about you when you register with us or use any of our websites / services. Part of the registration process may include entering personal details & details of your investments.
We may collect information about your computer, including where available your operating system, browser version, domain name and IP address and details of the website that you came from, in order to improve this site.
You confirm that all information you supply is accurate.
COOKIES
In order to provide personalised services to and analyse site traffic, we may use a cookie file which is stored on your browser or the hard drive of your computer. Some of the cookies we use are essential for the sites to operate and may be used to deliver you different content, depending on the type of investor you are. 
You can block cookies by activating the setting on your browser which allows you to refuse the setting of all or some cookies. However, if you use your browser settings to block all cookies (including essential cookies) you may not be able to access all or part of our sites. Unless you have adjusted your browser setting so that it will refuse cookies, our system will issue cookies as soon as you visit our sites.
HOW WE USE INFORMATION
We store and use information you provide as follows:

to present content effectively;
to provide you with information, products or services that you request from us or which may interest you, tailored to your specific interests, where you have consented to be contacted for such purposes;
to carry out our obligations arising from any contracts between you and us;
to enable you to participate in interactive features of our service, when you choose to do so;
to notify you about changes to our service;
to improve our content by tracking group information that describes the habits, usage, patterns and demographics of our customers.

We may also send you emails to provide information and keep you up to date with developments on our sites. It is our policy to have instructions on how to unsubscribe so that you will not receive any future e-mails. You can change your e-mail address at any time.
In order to provide support on the usage of our tools, our support team need access to all information provided in relation to the tool.
We will not disclose your name, email address or postal address or any data that could identify you to any third party without first receiving your permission.
However, you agree that we may disclose to any regulatory authority to which we are subject and to any investment exchange on which we may deal or to its related clearing house (or to investigators, inspectors or agents appointed by them), or to any person empowered to require such information by or under any legal enactment, any information they may request or require relating to you, or if relevant, any of your clients.
You agree that we may pass on information obtained under Money Laundering legislation as we consider necessary to comply with reporting requirements under such legislation.
ACCESS TO YOUR INFORMATION AND CORRECTION
We want to ensure that the personal information we hold about you is accurate and up to date. You may ask us to correct or remove information that is inaccurate.
You have the right under data protection legislation to access information held about you. If you wish to receive a copy of any personal information we hold, please write to us at 3rd Floor, Hollywood House, Church Street East, Woking, GU21 6HJ. Any access request may be subject to a fee of £10 to meet our costs in providing you with details of the information we hold about you.
WHERE WE STORE YOUR PERSONAL DATA
The data that we collect from you may be transferred to, and stored at, a destination outside the European Economic Area (“EEA”). It may be processed by staff operating outside the EEA who work for us or for one of our suppliers. Such staff may be engaged in, amongst other things, the provision of support services. By submitting your personal data, you agree to this transfer, storing and processing. We will take all steps reasonably necessary, including the use of encryption, to ensure that your data is treated securely and in accordance with this privacy policy.
Unfortunately, the transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure. Although we will do our best to protect your personal data, we cannot guarantee the security of your data transmitted to our sites; any transmission is at your own risk. You will not hold us responsible for any breach of security unless we have been negligent or in wilful default.
CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
Any changes we make to our privacy policy in the future will be posted on this page and, where appropriate, notified to you by e-mail.
OTHER WEBSITES
Our sites contain links to other websites. If you follow a link to any of these websites, please note that these websites have their own privacy policies and that we do not accept any responsibility or liability for these policies. Please check these policies before you submit any personal data to these websites.
CONTACT
If you want more information or have any questions or comments relating to our privacy policy please email [email protected] in the first instance.







FE Trustnet UK  |  FE Trustnet Offshore  |  FE Trustnet Hong Kong  |  FE Trustnet Middle East  |  FE Analytics  |  FE Fundlistings


 Rss  |  About Us  |  Contact Us  |  Help





 



Company announcements
Company news
FE Trustnet Fundswire







Today's announcements
Most read announcements
Announcements archive
Advanced search





 Email address
 Password
  Register
|
 Login











 Information
 X 


Enter a valid email address


 Show me how to log in	  Forgot password?











Keyword
Company
EPIC/TIDM
SEDOL/ISIN
News





















Price
Announcements
Fundamentals
News
Article
RSS





XLMedia PLC (XLM)


Add to Alerts list








 
                    Print   
                     
                    Mail a friend





Wednesday 30 March, 2016


XLMedia PLC
Final Results

RNS Number : 4636T XLMedia PLC 30 March 2016  





For immediate release


30 March 2016




 
 
 
XLMedia PLC
("XLMedia" or "the Group" or "the Company")
 
Final results for the year ended 31 December 2015
 
Strong financial performance underpinning strategic development
 
XLMedia (AIM: XLM), a leading provider of digital performance marketing services, is pleased to announce its final results for the year ended 31 December 2015.
 
The Group continued to deliver strong performance during the year, building on the foundations that it had laid over the past two years. By setting a clear strategy and focusing on execution, the Company has continued to deliver in all key areas, namely revenues and profit growth, investment in technology, and ongoing diversification of the business. The Board is confident that the Group remains well positioned to continue this strong growth and to further develop its business. 
 
Financial highlights
 
·     Revenues increased 76% to $89.2 million (2014: $50.7 million)
·     Gross profit increased 49% to $41.1 million (2014: $27.6 million)
·     Adjusted EBITDA increased 67% to $28.4 million (2014: $17.0 million)
·     Profit before tax increased 84% to $24.3 million (2014: $13.2 million)
·     Net cash from operating activities increased 68% to $28.4 million (2014: $16.9 million)
·     Net income increased 70% to $20.2 million (2014: $11.9 million)
·     Strong balance sheet with $42.6 million cash and short term investments
 
Operating highlights
 
·     Positive impact of acquisitions continues to accelerate profit growth and strategic progress
o  Strong performance from Marmar Media acquisition, adding skills and client base in additional verticals, namely software and ecommerce
o  First phase integration of EDM now completed, second phase progressing well
o  Extension of our network through ongoing bolt on acquisitions within the Publishing division of mainly UK based websites
·     Ongoing R&D has strengthened the Groups in house operations and enhanced our analytics capabilities
·     Continued organic growth in all business segments and geographies
 
The Board continues to remain confident of the Company's ability to continue to execute and deliver in the key areas and is focussed on maximising value for shareholders.
 
Ory Weihs, Chief Executive Officer of XLMedia, commented:
 
"We are extremely pleased to report another record breaking year. During 2015 we continued to invest in our technology, systems and people which are the key drivers for performance and future growth. We also made significant progress regarding acquisitions, and successfully diversified our business further.
 
"Over the last two years we have consistently reported strong financial performance, invested in organic growth opportunities, completed several successful earning enhancing acquisitions and declared $21.25 million in dividends to shareholders.
 
"We continue as always to maximise value for our shareholders, both through our ongoing work in developing the business as well as through the strategic review process which was announced on 26 January 2016.
 
"The Board would like to thank management and our employees for the excellent delivery of 2015 results. We look forward to further progress and achievements in 2016."
 
 
Our full annual financial statements are available on our website at the following address:
http://www.xlmedia.com/company-reports/
 
 
For further information, please contact:
 




XLMedia plc
Ory Weihs
www.xlmedia.com
 


Tel: 020 8817 5283




Vigo Communications
Jeremy Garcia / Fiona Henson
www.vigocomms.com
 


Tel: 020 7830 9700




Cenkos Securities plc (Nomad and Joint Broker)
Ivonne Cantu / Camilla Hume
www.cenkos.com 
 


Tel: 020 7397 8900




Liberum (Joint Broker)
Neil Patel / Chris Clarke
www.liberum.com 


Tel: 020 3100 2000




 
 
 
Business review
 
During 2015 we continued to execute our strategic plan and establish our position as a dominant player in the online and mobile traffic monetisation arena. 
 
Our strategic plan includes the following key growth initiatives: broadening our reach to additional geographies and verticals; developing our technology infrastructure to enable our growth and competitive edge; and driving organic growth. 
 
We are proud to report progress on executing our plan in all aspects, which resulted in the delivery of record breaking revenues and profit in 2015. 
 
Our efforts to accelerate growth through acquisitions have also progressed well during the year with the following milestones achieved:
 
·     Addition of bolt on domains and websites through acquisition, complementing our publishing asset base and providing access to additional markets and products. The focus of these additional assets was for the UK as well as other European markets, and for diversified verticals. Additional bolt ons were targeted at mobile traffic in these markets. All of these acquired assets have been integrated into our publishing division and in house platforms. 
·    Completed the first phase of integration of EDM (acquired September 2014) into the Group during the period and due to EDM's strong performance in the first year following its acquisition we decided to waive performance conditions for contingent consideration to accelerate full integration into the Group. The Board believes that such integration will help to improve performance and increase scale which is important as it expects social and mobile gaming to be a strong growth driver for XLMedia over the coming years. 
·    On 1 July 2015 we announced the acquisition of the majority stake in Marmar Media, a performance media company for web and mobile.  Marmar Media adds additional know how and scale, as well as widening the Group's customer base and adding further vertical diversification.
·   All of the acquired assets and companies are performing in line with or above management's expectations. 
 
Below is an overview of the progress in execution of our plan during 2015:
 
·     Technology infrastructure to enable our growth and competitive edge
o We continued to increase our investment in technology and our R&D team now has over 50 staff and continues to grow. 
o Following the launch of our Palcon system for the management of publishing assets at the end of 2014, we migrated our major assets to Palcon. Following migration we have seen continuous improvement in mobile performance of these websites.   
o In the media segment we developed tracking tools and campaign management infrastructure to enable efficient optimization and management of campaigns.
o In December 2015 we launched Rampix - EDM's system for centralized management of social campaigns with unique targeting methodologies and dashboards. 
o We further enhanced our Business Intelligence ("BI") capabilities to support information gathered from thousands of information sources, analysed and presented to our campaign managers for efficient optimization of campaigns.
 
·     Broaden our reach to additional geographies and verticals, diversifying our client base and markets
o We successfully broadened our business to new geographies and products, through organic growth as well as acquisitions
o The acquired websites extended our reach and established our position in the UK market 
o We made our first acquisitions of websites in the financial services vertical in Europe. We believe there are growth opportunities within the financial services vertical, where we can use our online marketing expertise to bring further revenue growth 
o The addition of Marmar Media added more activity in software and e-commerce verticals
o EDM continues to develop the Group's offering for mobile apps and social gaming 
o Following the Marmar Media acquisition the largest customer in the group1 represents 8% of the Group's revenues 
 
·     Continue our organic growth 
o The Group continues to deliver strong organic growth in all of its business segments with the 2015 year-end trading performance exceeding initial market expectations 
o Organic growth continues to be strong in our core Scandinavian markets, while in other European countries as well as other English speaking countries  we have increased our revenues even faster, with these countries becoming more dominant in the revenue distribution
o With the implementation of technology and tools we see improved performance and organic growth for websites and campaigns. We expect to continue this trend into 2016 and coming years
 
Business Segments review




($'000)


Publishing


Media


Partner Network


Total




2015


 


 


 


 




Revenues


30,297


45,777


13,145


89,219




% of revenues


34%


51%


15%


100%




Direct profit


23,855


15,411


1,810


41,076




Profit margin


79%


34%


14%


46%




 


 


 


 


 




2014


 


 


 


 




Revenues


23,965


20,632


6,123


50,720




% of revenues


47%


41%


12%


100%




Direct profit


18,345


8,548


685


27,578




Profit margin


76%


41%


11%


54%




 
·     Publishing
 
Publishing revenues grew 26% to $30.3 million (2014: $24.0 million). The growth was primarily organic, with some additions from new assets acquired mainly during the second half the year.
 
We invested significant amounts in technology infrastructure to support the centralised management of our assets and we have seen improvement in conversions and performance of our assets as a result, with increased improvement in mobile results. 
 
During 2015 we invested $7.1 million in acquiring new websites and domains and we plan to continue buying and developing more assets to further drive our growth.
 
·     Media
 
Media revenues grew 122% to $45.8 million (2014: $20.6 million). The media segment includes the activity of the Company as well as EDM acquired in September 2014 and Marmar Media acquired in July 2015. EDM and Marmar Media add diversification of our activity with additional marketing channels, products and markets. The majority of revenues from the acquired businesses is derived from the US for marketing of social games, mobile apps, ecommerce and software.
 
Marmar Media has contributed $9.1 million to 2015 revenues. Excluding Marmar Media and the EDM additions (EDM's contribution of $6.0 in the last 4 months of 2014 compounded annually), organic growth in the media segment was 28%.
 
We continue to focus on performance, using our technology to improve ROI of spend in marketing campaigns. 
 
·     Partner Network
 
Partner network revenues grew 115% to $13.1 million (2014: $6.1 million). Our partner network remains an important part of our business, giving us the opportunity to provide marketing services to our clients which are not currently serviced through our existing publishing and media networks. All of the partner network growth is organic, as we continue to attract new partners to join our network and enjoy the benefits offered to them. 
 
Current Trading and Outlook
 
Demand for our services has continued across our geographic footprint and the Group has made a strong start in 2016.  We will continue to seek ways in which to maximize shareholder value at the same time as continuing to commit to expanding our core offer through a combination of ongoing investment, product development and acquisitions. 
 
 
 
Financial review
$ millions




 


2015


2014


Change




Revenues


89.2


50.7


76%




Gross Profit


41.1


27.6


49%




Operating expenses


18.1


13.0


40%




Operating income


23.0


14.2


61%




Adjusted EBITDA


28.5


17.0


68%




Financial income, net


1.7


(0.8)


N/A




Profit Before Tax


24.3


13.2


84%




 
2015 has been another year of strong performance for XLMedia. Revenues for the year were $89.2 million, reflecting 76% growth compared to the last year. Revenues in 2015 include the acquisition of Marmar Media, acquired in July 2015, and the consolidation of EDM, acquired in September 2014, as well as strong organic growth in all business segments during the period.  
 
Gross profit reached $41.1 million or 46% of revenues, representing 49% growth compared to last year (2014: $27.6 million, 54%). Over the course of 2015, the media segment has grown to be the largest segment in XLMedia and generating 51% of FY 15 revenues. As we continue implementing our strategy to further increase and develop our media business, the Group's revenue mix will shift further towards media, lowering gross margins. As such we expect total gross margins (in terms of percentage) to decrease further across the Group. 
 
Operating expenses during 2015 were $18.1 million, an increase of 40% compared to last year (2014: $13.0 million). As expected, recruiting pace was stronger in the second half of the year as we worked hard to recruit additional staff to support our growing operations. 
 
Operating expenses included $1.4 million of research and development costs, reflecting an increase of 43% compared to last year (2014: $1.0 million). These expenses are in addition to the increase of 123% in investments in internal systems developed through capitalized costs during the year of $2.0 million (2014: $0.9 million). The Group expects to invest further in technology as we see this a key driver to growth and profit for the coming years. 
 
Adjusted EBITDA2 reached $28.4 million or 32% of revenues, reflecting an increase of 67% to the previous year (2014: $17.0 million, 34%). As the mix of revenues changes towards more media, we expect adjusted EBITDA to decrease in terms of margins but to grow in absolute numbers. 
 
Net financial income for year was $1.7 million, attributed to the Company's dynamic hedging activity to mitigate material exposure to foreign currencies. As a significant portion of the Group's revenues are denominated in Euros, the Company entered into a series of forward contracts for the sale of Euros and purchase of US Dollars. The Euro exchange rate decreased by 6.6% versus the US Dollar during this period. The Company gained financial income from its hedging activity which partially compensated for the decrease. The financial income was received in cash (when forward contracts matured) while the amounts recorded as fair value gains for forward contracts not yet matured was not material. The Company has entered into additional forward contracts which will mature over the course of the next 12 months. 
 
As a result of the high adjusted EBITDA as well as the financial gain from changes in exchange rates, profit before tax increased by 84% to $24.3 million (2014: $13.2 million). 
 
As of 31 December 2015 we had $42.6 million cash and short term investments compared to $44.1 million on December 31, 2014.  The change in cash reflects an increase of $28.4 million provided by operating activity, offset mainly by spending $19.7 million on investments in technology and acquisitions and $8.0 million of dividends paid during 2015.  
 
Current assets at 31 December 2015 were $60.9 million (31 Dec 2014: $57.8 million) and non-current assets reached $57.9 million (31 December 2014: $42.0 million). The increase in non-current assets is attributed mainly to the acquisition of Marmar Media shares, investments in domains and websites, as well as additions to our in-house technology.
 
Total equity on 31 December 2015 reached $90.0 million, or 75% (2014: 76%). This, with cash and short term investments of $42.6 million, positions the Group well to continue executing its strategic plan.

 

 
1 Revenues for the six months ending 31 December 2015
2 Earning Before interest, Taxes, Depreciation and Amortization and adjusted to exclude share based payments and expenses related to acquisition agreements

 

PRELIMINARY CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL INFORMATION AS OF DECEMBER 31, 2015
 

CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF FINANCIAL POSITION






 


 


 


As of 31 December 




 


 


 


 


2015


 


2014




 


 


 


 


USD in thousands




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




    Assets


 


 


 


 


 


 




   Current assets:


 


 


 


 


 


 




Cash and cash equivalents


 


 


 


35,741


 


27,351




Short-term investments


 


 


 


6,866


 


16,714




Trade receivables


 


 


 


16,088


 


11,548




Other receivables


 


 


 


2,042


 


1,895




Financial derivatives


 


 


 


165


 


264




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


60,902


 


57,772




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




   Non-current assets:


 


 


 


 


 


 




Long-term investments


 


 


 


1,102


 


333




Other receivables


 


 


 


332


 


456




Property and equipment


 


 


 


1,190


 


864




Goodwill


 


 


 


26,302


 


19,586




Domains and websites


 


 


 


23,897


 


16,728




Other intangible assets


 


 


 


4,837


 


4,014




Deferred taxes


 


 


 


256


 


-




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


57,916


 


41,981




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


118,818


 


99,753





 
 

CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF FINANCIAL POSITION






 


 


 


As of 31 December




 


 


 


 


2015


 


2014




 


 


 


 


USD in thousands




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




   Liabilities and equity


 


 


 


 


 


 




   Current liabilities:


 


 


 


 


 


 




Trade payables


 


 


 


11,146


 


9,073




Contingent consideration payable


 


 


 


5,373


 


3,396




Other liabilities and accounts payable


 


 


 


12,151


 


7,764




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


28,670


 


20,233




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




   Non-current liabilities:


 


 


 


 


 


 




Contingent consideration payable


 


 


 


-


 


3,233




Deferred taxes


 


 


 


317


 


332




Other liabilities


 


 


 


155


 


42




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


472


 


3,607




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




   Equity attributable to equity holders of the Company:


 


 


 


 


 


 




Share capital


 


 


 


*)


 


*)




Share premium


 


 


 


64,447


 


62,271




Capital reserve from share-based transactions


 


 


 


1,390


 


1,784




Capital reserve from transaction with non-controlling interests


 


 


 


(506)


 


(506)




Retained earnings


 


 


 


22,774


 


12,072




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


88,105


 


75,621




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Non-controlling interests


 


 


 


1,571


 


292




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




   Total equity


 


 


 


89,676


 


75,913




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


118,818


 


99,753





 
 
*) Lower than USD 1 thousand.
 

CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF PROFIT OR LOSS AND OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME

 





 


 


 


 


Year ended 31
December




 


 


 


 


2015


 


2014




 


 


 


 


USD in thousands
(except per share data)




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Revenues


 


 


 


89,219


 


50,720




Cost of revenues


 


 


 


48,143


 


23,142




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Gross profit


 


 


 


41,076


 


27,578




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Research and development expenses


 


 


 


1,438


 


1,008




Selling and marketing expenses


 


 


 


3,038


 


2,239




General and administrative expenses


 


 


 


13,640


 


9,732




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


18,116


 


12,979




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Operating income before expenses in connection with IPO


 


 


 


22,960


 


14,599




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Expenses  in connection with IPO


 


 


 


-


 


361




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Operating income after expenses in connection with IPO


 


 


 


22,960


 


14,238




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Finance expenses


 


 


 


(523)


 


(1,001)




Finance income


 


 


 


2,259


 


231




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Income before other expenses


 


 


 


24,696


 


13,468




 
Other expenses, net


 


 


 


(403)


 


(229)




 


 


 


 


24,293


 


13,239




Profit before taxes on income


 


 


 


 




Taxes on income


 


 


 


4,093


 


1,329




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Net income and other comprehensive income


 


 


 


20,200


 


11,910




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Attributable to:


 


 


 


 


 


 




 Equity holders of the Company


 


 


 


18,719


 


9,821




 Non-controlling interests


 


 


 


1,481


 


2,089




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


20,200


 


11,910




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Earnings per share attributable to equity holders of the Company:


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Basic earnings per share (in USD)


 


 


 


0.10


 


0.06




 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Diluted earnings per share (in USD)


 


 


 


0.10


 


0.05




 


 


 


 


 


 


 






 


CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS





 


 


Year ended
31 December  




 


 


2015


 


2014




 


 


USD in thousands




Cash flows from operating activities:


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


 




Net income


 


20,200


 


11,910




 


 


 


 


 




Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


 




Adjustments to the profit or loss items:


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


 




Depreciation and amortisation


 


3,775


 


1,296




Finance expense income, net


 


231


 


25




Finance income from financial derivatives


 


99


 


(264)




Loss  from sale of assets


 


-


 


9




Cost of share-based payment


 


839


 


1,042




Taxes on income


 


4,093


 


1,329




Exchange differences on balances of cash and cash equivalents


 


310


 


482




 


 


 


 


 




 


 


9,347


 


3,919




Changes in asset and liability items:


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


 




Decrease (increase) in trade receivables


 


(3,580)


 


994




Increase  in other receivables


 


(432)


 


(608)




Decrease in related parties


 


-


 


142




Increase (decrease) in trade payables


 


1,155


 


(256)




Increase in other accounts payable


 


3,892


 


782




Increase in other long-term liabilities


 


99


 


18




 


 


 


 


 




 


 


1,134


 


1,072




Cash received (paid) during the period for:


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


 




Interest paid


 


(2)


 


-




Interest received


 


72


 


46




Taxes paid


 


(2,352)


 


(421)




Taxes received


 


-


 


417




 


 


 


 


 




 


 


(2,282)


 


42




 


 


 


 


 




Net cash provided by operating activities


 


28,399


 


16,943




 
 




 


 


Year ended
31 December  




 


 


2015


 


2014




 


 


USD in thousands




Cash flows from investing activities:


 


 


 


 




Purchase of property and equipment


 


(644)


 


(350)




Acquisition of initially consolidated companies


 


(4,459)


 


(9,950)




Payment of contingent consideration in respect of acquired company


 


(3,500)


 


-




Acquisition of  domains, websites and other intangible assets


 


(12,326)


 


(11,528)




Proceeds and collection of receivable from sale of assets


 


300


 


328




Short- term and long-term investments, net


 


9,625


 


(16,315)




 


 


 


 


 




Net cash used in investing activities


 


(11,004)


 


(37,815)




 


 


 


 


 




Cash flows from financing activities:


 


 


 


 




Issue of share capital (net of issue costs)


 


-


 


48,917




Dividend paid to equity holders


 


(8,017)


 


(8,243)




Acquisition of non-controlling interests


 


-


 


(1,490)




Dividend paid to non-controlling interests


 


(694)


 


(2,287)




Repayment of liabilities to related parties


 


-


 


(3,512)




Exercise of options


 


943


 


12




Financing by non-controlling interests


 


-


 


57




Payments of liabilities to former shareholders of acquired businesses


 


(927)


 


-




Repayment of long-term and short-term liabilities


 


-


 


(204)




 


 


 


 


 




Net cash provided by ( used in) financing activities


 


(8,695)


 


33,250




 


 


 


 


 




Exchange differences on balances of cash and cash equivalents


 


(310)


 


(482)




 


 


 


 


 




Increase  in cash and cash equivalents


 


8,390


 


11,896




Cash and cash equivalents at the beginning of the year


 


27,351


 


15,455




 


 


 


 


 




Cash and cash equivalents at the end of the year


 


35,741


 


27,351




 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


 


 



 
 
 
 
 
 
 



 
 
 

NOTES TO PRELIMINARY CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL INFORMATION

 
NOTE 1:         GENERAL
 
The Group is an online performance marketing company. The Group attracts paying users from multiple online and mobile channels and directs them to online and mobile businesses who, in turn, convert such traffic into paying customers.
 
Online traffic is attracted by the Group's publications and advertisements and are then directed, by the Group, to its customers in return for mainly a share of the revenue generated by such user, a fee generated per user acquired, fixed fees or a hybrid of any of these models.
 
NOTE 2:         OPERATING SEGMENTS
 
(a)  General:
 
The operating segments are identified on the basis of information that is reviewed by the chief operating decision maker ("CODM") to make decisions about resources to be allocated and assess its performance. Accordingly, for management purposes, the Group is organised into operating segments based on the products and services of the business units and has operating segments as follows:
 




Publishing


-


 The Group owns over 2,000 informational websites in 17 languages. These websites refer potential customers to online businesses. The sites' content, written by professional writers, is designed to attract online traffic which the Group then directs to its customers online businesses.




 




Media                           


-


The Group's Media division acquires online and mobile advertising targeted at potential online and mobile traffic with the objective of directing it to the Group's users. The Group buys advertising space on search engines, websites, mobile and social networks and places adverts referring potential users to the Group's customers' websites or to its own websites.




 


 


 




Partners Network


-


The Group manages marketing partners, whose role is to direct online traffic to the Group's customers for which the Group receives revenues. The Group is responsible for paying its partners. The Group's partner programme enables affiliates to have a single point of contact to direct traffic to, and receive monies from, rather than engaging in multilateral negotiation, administration and collection of revenues.




 
Segment performance (segment profit) is evaluated based on revenues less direct operating costs. Items that were not allocated are managed on a group basis.
 
 
(b) Reporting on operating segments:




 
 


 


Publishing


 


Media


 


Partners Network


 


Total


 




 


 


USD in thousands




Year ended 31 December 2015:


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Revenues


 


30,297


 


45,777


 


13,145


 


89,219


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Segment profit


 


23,855


 


15,411


 


1,810


 


41,076


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Unallocated corporate expenses


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 (18,116)


 




Other expense, net


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


(403)


 




Finance income, net


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


1,736


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Profit before taxes on income


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


24,293


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Year ended 31 December 2014:


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Revenues


 


23,965


 


20,632


 


6,123


 


50,720


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Segment profit


 


18,345


 


8,548


 


685


 


27,578


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Unallocated corporate expenses


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


(13,340)


 




Other income, net


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


(229)


 




Finance expense, net


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


(770)


 




 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


 




Profit  before taxes on income


 


 


 


 


 


 


 


13,239


 




 
(c)       Geographic information:
 
Revenues classified by geographical areas based on internet user location:
 




 


Year ended 31 December




 


2015


 


2014




 


 


 


 




Scandinavia 


29,414


 


28,164




Other European countries


16,732


 


7,457




North America


19,588


 


4,918




Oceania


2,788


 


942




Other countries


2,610


 


3,116




 


 


 


 




Total revenues from identified locations 


71,132


 


44,597




Revenues from unidentified locations


18,087


 


6,123




 


 


 


 




Total revenues


89,219


 


50,720




 

This information is provided by RNSThe company news service from the London Stock Exchange   END  FR LLFLAVFIAFIR





























            *All intraday prices are subject to a delay of fifteen (15) minutes.

            FE Investegate takes no responsibility for the accuracy of the information within
            this site.

            The announcements are supplied by the denoted source. Queries about the content
            of an announcement should be directed to the source. FE Investegate reserves the
            right to publish a filtered set of announcements. NAV, EMM/EPT, Rule 8 and FRN Variable
            Rate Fix announcements are filtered from this site.


     ©
                2017 Financial Express. All rights reserved. Visit other
                    FE websites
                    
Go to website
FE Trustnet UK
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Middle East
FE Analytics
FE Fundlistings








 Close 


To help us provide a better service, please select the description which fits you best...

Investor with a financial adviser or broker
Investor without a financial adviser or broker
Financial adviser
Market professional (broker, banker, solicitor, etc)
Discretionary fund manager
Institutional investor



Close this window
Why are you asking me this question?





Related Instruments












 This website is for Private Investors* only

To continue using FE Investegate, please confirm that you are a private investor.

I am a private investor * I am not a private investor



    *A Private Investor is a recipient of the information who meets all of the conditions set out below, the recipient:
    1. Obtains access to the information in a personal capacity;
    2. Is not required to be regulated or supervised by a body concerned with the regulation or supervision of investment or financial services;
    3. Is not currently registered or qualified as a professional securities trader or investment adviser with any national or state exchange, regulatory authority, professional association or recognised professional body;
    4. Does not currently act in any capacity as an investment adviser, whether or not they have at some time been qualified to do so;
    5. Uses the information solely in relation to the management of their personal funds and not as a trader to the public or for the investment of corporate funds;
    6. Does not distribute, republish or otherwise provide any information or derived works to any third party in any manner or use or process information or derived works for any commercial purposes.
    







 To continue to use FE Investegate, please confirm you are a private investor

This website is only for private investors. By using this site, you agree to use the content for private use only.
Please confirm that you are a private investor using the buttons below.

I am a private investor I am not a private investor












        a d v e r t i s e m e n t



























Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-刊登關鍵字廣告

















 


Yahoo!奇摩首頁
        | 登入Bing
        | 登入YAM


 




Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-最新優惠

Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-原生廣告專區

原生廣告介紹
常見問題
經銷商招募


Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-什麼是關鍵字廣告
Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-廣告版位
Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-如何計費
Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-常見問題


Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-成功案例



 



 













超值關鍵字行銷方案
（連續60天曝光，每日預算500元）
免費享有：

帳戶顧問專業建議
專業文案編輯3次(價值6千元)
安裝成效追蹤碼
最新優惠訊息






入門方案
（30天曝光，每日預算800元）
免費享有：

新手優化手冊
專業文案編輯1次





 - 





點此查看網站規範

立即完成註冊
































經銷商專區 | 
隱私權政策  | 

廣告客戶服務條款  | 
廣告規範 

雅虎數位行銷 版權所有 © 2017 Yahoo Digital Marketing. All Rights Reserved.























XLMEDIA ORD USD0.000001 quote - Product overview - London Stock Exchange 















 










 
Please click here if you are not redirected within a few seconds.














     















Deutsch





español





suomi





français





italiano





Nederlands





português





русский





svenska





中文









Member's area



Login
Sign up
FAQ



















 Stock exchange


All Stocks


Euronext Stocks


US NASDAQ Stocks


US NYSE Stocks


US Tech 150


US NonTech 200


UK Stocks


UK AIM


UK 300


UK 200


 Indices


All indices


Europe Indices


NASDAQ COMPOSITE


DOW JONES INDUSTRIAL


S&P500


FTSE 100


NIKKEI 225


EURO STOXX 50


CAC40


DAX30


IBEX 35


FTSE MIB 40


 Forex


All currency pairs


Forex (47 main pairs)


Forex (128 currency pairs)


AUD currency pairs


CAD currency pairs


CHF currency pairs


EUR currency pairs


GBP currency pairs


JPY currency pairs


NZD currency pairs


USD currency pairs


 Commodities


All commodities


Gold (XAUUSD)


Silver (XAGUSD)


BRENT & WTI CRUDE OIL


Ranking


Products ranking


Traders ranking


Need technical analysis?


Technical analysis request


All technical analysis







 Stock exchange


Euronext Stocks


US NASDAQ Stocks


US NYSE Stocks


US NYSE Market 50


US NonTech 200


UK Stocks


UK AIM


UK 300


UK 200


 Indices


Major stock indices


Europe Indices


Indices Futures


Sector indices


United States


France


Germany


Spain


Italy


Netherlands


 Forex


128 currency pairs


AUD currency pairs


CAD currency pairs


CHF currency pairs


EUR currency pairs


GBP currency pairs


JPY currency pairs


NZD currency pairs


USD currency pairs


 Commodities


All commodities







 Stock exchange


All Stocks


Euronext Stocks


US NASDAQ Stocks


US NYSE Stocks


US Tech 150


US NonTech 200


UK Stocks


UK AIM


UK 300


UK 200


 Indices


All indices


Europe Indices


NASDAQ COMPOSITE


DOW JONES INDUSTRIAL


S&P500


FTSE 100


NIKKEI 225


EURO STOXX 50


CAC40


DAX30


IBEX 35


FTSE MIB 40


 Forex


All currency pairs


Forex (47 main pairs)


Forex (128 currency pairs)


AUD currency pairs


CAD currency pairs


CHF currency pairs


EUR currency pairs


GBP currency pairs


JPY currency pairs


NZD currency pairs


USD currency pairs


EUR/USD


USD/JPY


 Commodities


All commodities


Other categories


Economic news


Political news


Financial markets


Global news







 Groups


Active Groups


Popular groups


New Groups


Groups Forum


 Forum


Main Forum


Stocks Forum


Indices Forum


Forex Forum


Commodities Forum


 Social Networks


CentralCharts Twitter


 Widgets & Services


Centralcharts' widget






 
 





Number of analysis



Number of traders



Since last analysis


 
Find a Product / Trader / Group :


Narrow your search...

Stocks
Forex
Indices
Commodities

Warrants
Bonds
ETF
Futures


Traders
Groups














 


















 



XLMEDIA ORD USD0.000001 





OverviewQuotesChartNewsAnalysisWarrantsProfileWallForum 


 




-
 GBX				
(-)

  15 min delay - London Stock Exchange 










Open:
-


Change:
-


Volume:
-










Low:
-


High:
-


High / Low range:
-








Type:
Stocks


Ticker:
XLM


ISIN:

JE00BH6XDL31	
















Overview


Quotes


Chart


News


Analysis


Warrants


Profile


Wall


Forum














 






XLMEDIA ORD USD0.000001 overview



5 days quotes  15 min delay - London Stock Exchange



07/28/201707/31/201708/01/201708/02/201708/03/2017
 


Last132.57129.32131.05135.50133.49


Change (%)-0.18%-2.45%+1.33%+3.40%-1.48%


Volume334,7004,70221,629463,341487,550







5 days change : +0.52%






						XLMEDIA ORD USD0.000001 - More quotes...
Lastest analysis



No technical analysis



Lastest news





No news



Lastest discussions



No discussion












Follow this product



Post an Analysis




Request an analysis





							Add to a list						


Technical analysis requests

No technical analysis requests
See all analysis requests 



Statistics


Analysis							: 
Follower(s) : 




Currently on this Wall



Join these members now



				Activity on				XLMEDIA ORD USD0.000001			





 





 












變頻器,PLC控制器,安川代理商,國際牌代理商,視覺對位系統,歐姆龍控制器


































繁體中文 │  English










可程式控制器的人機介面



公司簡介  服務項目 產品介紹公司位置 聯絡我們





鑫弘展企業有限公司屬於自動化電機電子類產品的貿易商，提供國內外客戶所需各項產品外，更引進國外先進技術，協助客戶系統的規劃、諮詢、技術的支援及問題的克服，而不是單純的買賣業，而自動化是世界的趨勢，需結合電子、電機、資訊、網路、機械......等等領域，運用各種最先進技術，來達成客戶的需求，而且為了增加客戶的需求，還附屬室內裝潢業的導入來跟進世界的趨勢讓生活有更高的品質，如智慧型住宅、節能減碳、太陽能......等等，可以讓顧客一次購足別再尋找其他商品的時間，除此之外，本公司朝向經營多元化、產業多角化、系統整合方案、商品多樣化的目標來發展，來提供客戶最好的服務。







專業的貿易商滿足您的所有需求



聯絡電話:02-2848-3135    傳真:02-2848-8271    聯絡地址:24743新北市蘆洲區民族路506號5樓
        Copyright    ©    2013 變頻器-鑫弘展企業有限公司. All Rights Reserved. Design by web5000 網頁設計.


Sitemap 三菱代理商 歐姆龍代理商





